pt-BR: Linha compatível: Linha de costura multiuso; Linha elástica; Linha de meada; Linha para costura manual; Linha extraforte; Linha metálica; Linha monofilamento/invisível; Linha para quilting; Outro
tr: Uyumlu iplik: Çok amaçlı dikiş ipliği; Elastik iplik; Nakış ipliği; El dikişi ipliği; Ağır hizmet ipliği; Metalik iplik; Monofilament/görünmez iplik; Kapitone ipliği; Diğer
en: Compatible thread: All-purpose sewing thread; Elastic thread; Embroidery floss; Hand-sewing thread; Heavy-duty thread; Metallic thread; Monofilament/Invisible thread; Quilting thread; Other
pl: Kompatybilna nić: Uniwersalna nić do szycia; Nić elastyczna; Mulina; Nić do szycia ręcznego; Nić wzmocniona (heavy-duty); Nić metalizowana; Nić monofilamentowa/niewidoczna; Nić do pikowania; Inne
vi: Chỉ may tương thích: Chỉ may đa năng; Chỉ thun; Chỉ thêu; Chỉ khâu tay; Chỉ chịu lực; Chỉ kim tuyến; Chỉ cước/Chỉ tàng hình; Chỉ chần bông; Khác
fi: Yhteensopiva lanka: Yleisompelulanka; Joustolanka; Kirjontalanka; Käsiompelulanka; Kestävä ompelulanka; Metallilanka; Monofilamentti-/näkymätön lanka; Tikkauslanka; Muu
zh-CN: 适配螺纹: 多用途缝纫线; 弹力线; 绣花线; 手工缝纫线; 粗线; 金属线; 单丝线/隐形线; 绗缝线; 其他
th: รูปแบบเส้นด้ายที่ใช้งานด้วยได้: ด้ายเย็บผ้าอเนกประสงค์; ด้ายยางยืด; ไหมปัก; ด้ายเย็บมือ; ด้ายทนแรงดึงสูง; ด้ายเมทัลลิก; ด้ายเอ็น/ด้ายล่องหน; ด้ายควิลต์; อื่นๆ
it: threadelettrico: Filo da cucito universale; Filo elastico; Filo da ricamo; Filo per cucito a mano; Filo resistente; Filo metallico; Monofilo/Filo invisibile; Filo per quilting; Altro
zh-TW: 相容的線材: 多用途縫紉線; 彈性線; 刺繡線; 手縫線; 粗縫線; 金屬線; 單絲/透明線; 拼布線; 其他
bg-BG: Съвместима резба: Универсален конец за шиене; Еластичен конец; Конец за бродерия; Конец за ръчно шиене; Здрав конец (Heavy-duty); Метализиран конец; Монофилен/невидим конец; Конец за капитониране; Друг
es: Hilo compatible: Hilo de coser multiuso; Hilo elástico; Hilo de bordar; Hilo para coser a mano; Hilo ultrarresistente; Hilo metálico; Hilo de monofilamento/invisible; Hilo para acolchar; Otro
el: Συμβατό νήμα: Κλωστή ραψίματος γενικής χρήσης; Ελαστική κλωστή; Νήμα κεντήματος; Κλωστή ραψίματος στο χέρι; Κλωστή βαρέως τύπου; Μεταλλική κλωστή; Μονόκλωνη/Αόρατη κλωστή; Κλωστή καπιτονέ; Άλλο
de: Kompatibler Faden: Allzweck-Nähgarn; Elastisches Garn; Stickgarn; Handnähgarn; Extra starkes Garn; Metallic-Garn; Monofilament/Unsichtbares Garn; Quiltgarn; Sonstige
ko: 호환 실: 다목적 재봉실; 고무실; 자수실; 손바느질 실; 강력 재봉실; 메탈릭 실; 모노필라멘트/투명실; 퀼트실; 기타
ru: Совместимая нить: Универсальные швейные нитки; Эластичные нитки; Мулине; Нитки для ручного шитья; Сверхпрочные нитки; Металлизированные нитки; Мононить / невидимые нитки; Нитки для квилтинга; Другое
da: Kompatibel tråd: Universal sytråd; Elastiktråd; Broderigarn; Håndsytråd; Ekstra stærk tråd; Metaltråd; Monofilament/usynlig tråd; Quiltetråd; Andet
fr: Fil compatible: Fil à coudre tout usage; Fil élastique; Fil à broder; Fil pour couture à la main; Fil ultra-résistant; Fil métallique; Fil monofilament/invisible; Fil à quilter; Autre
ro-RO: Fir compatibil: Ață de cusut universală; Ață elastică; Fir de brodat (mouliné); Ață pentru cusut manual; Ață extra rezistentă; Ață metalică; Ață monofilament/invizibilă; Ață pentru quilting; Altele
nl: Compatibele draad: Allesnaaigaren; Elastisch garen; Borduurgaren; Handnaaigaren; Extra sterk garen; Metallic garen; Monofilament/onzichtbaar garen; Quiltgaren; Overige
hu: Kompatibilis cérna: Általános varrócérna; Gumicérna; Hímzőfonal; Kézi varrócérna; Erősített varrócérna; Fémszálas cérna; Monofil/Láthatatlan cérna; Tűzőcérna; Egyéb
ja: 互換性のあるスレッド: 万能縫い糸; ゴム糸; 刺繍糸; 手縫い糸; 厚地用糸; メタリック糸; モノフィラメント/透明糸; キルティング糸; その他
nb: Kompatibel tråd: Universalsytråd; Elastisk tråd; Brodergarn; Håndsømstråd; Ekstra sterk tråd; Metalltråd; Monofilament / usynlig tråd; Quiltetråd; Annet
sl-SI: Združljiva nit: Večnamenski sukanec za šivanje; Elastični sukanec; Preja za vezenje; Sukanec za ročno šivanje; Sukanec za močne obremenitve; Kovinski sukanec; Monofilamentna/nevidna nit; Sukanec za prešite odeje; Drugo
cs: Kompatibilní vlákno: Univerzální šicí nit; Elastická nit; Vyšívací bavlnka; Nit na ruční šití; Pevná nit; Metalická nit; Monofilament / neviditelná nit; Nit na prošívání (quilting); Jiné
sk-SK: Kompatibilné vlákno: Viacúčelová šijacia niť; Elastická niť; Vyšívacia priadza; Niť na ručné šitie; Vysoko odolná niť; Metalická niť; Monofilová/neviditeľná niť; Prešívacia niť; Iné
pt-PT: Fio compatível: Linha de costura polivalente; Linha elástica; Fio de bordar; Linha de costura à mão; Linha resistente; Linha metálica; Fio monofilamento/invisível; Linha de acolchoar; Outra
sv: Kompatibel tråd: Allround-sytråd; Elastisk tråd; Broderigarn; Handsytråd; Extra stark tråd; Metalltråd; Monofilament/osynlig tråd; Quilttråd; Övrigt
hr-HR: Kompatibilna poruka: Višenamjenski konac za šivanje; Elastični konac; Konac za vezenje (mouline); Konac za ručno šivanje; Izdržljivi konac (za teške tkanine); Metalik konac; Monofilamentni / nevidljivi konac; Konac za prošivanje (quilting); Ostalo
lt-LT: Suderinamas siūlas: Universalūs siuvimo siūlai; Elastiniai siūlai; Siuvinėjimo siūlai (muline); Rankinio siuvimo siūlai; Tvirti siūlai; Metalo atspalvio siūlai; Monofilamentiniai / nematomi siūlai; Daigstymo siūlai; Kita